Wyoming, session 2026, HB0048.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-13-119 is created to read:

22-13-119. Paper ballots required; exceptions.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each
county shall provide paper ballots and pens as the default
method to mark ballots for all in-person voting in all
elections in Wyoming. The county clerk shall provide all
HB0048

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0040
voters with a paper ballot and a pen to mark the ballot
secretly as provided in this Election Code.

(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not prohibit
any county clerk from providing electronic ballot marking
devices for use by persons with disabilities. Electronic
ballot marking devices shall comply with all federal
accessibility requirements, including under the Help
America Vote Act of 2002, P.L. 107-252, and shall conform
with the requirements of this Election Code for voting
machines and electronic voting systems. Nothing in this
subsection shall authorize any county to use electronic
ballot marking devices as the default method of marking
ballots in the county.

(c) As used in this section:

(i) "Disability" has the meaning stated in the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended by the
Americans with Disabilities Amendments Act of 2008;

(ii) "Electronic ballot marking device" means
any electronic device that assists voters in marking
HB0048

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0040
ballots, including, without limitation, any voting machine
that uses a touch screen to produce a marked paper ballot
or ballot card.

Section 2. W.S. 22-10-102, 22-11-102, 22-21-109 and
22-22-203(b) are amended to read:

22-10-102. Selection by county commissioners.

Subject to the limitations of W.S. 22-13-119, the board of
county commissioners may adopt for use in any precinct in
the county a type of voting machine meeting the standards
specified in W.S. 22-10-101.

22-11-102. Use authorized; purchase or lease.

Subject to the limitations of W.S. 22-13-119, the board of
county commissioners of each county may adopt for use,
either experimentally or permanently, in any election in
any or all polling places within the county, any electronic
voting system authorized by law.

22-21-109. Supplies; regulations; costs.
HB0048

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0040

Subject to the limitations of W.S. 22-13-119, the county
clerk may utilize voting machines or electronic voting
systems at any bond election and may prescribe the form of
the ballot, the duties of election officials, and other
reasonable regulations pertaining thereto. The political
subdivision holding the bond election shall pay the actual
costs of the election or an equitably proportioned share of
a concurrent election, as determined by the county clerk.

22-22-203. Determining validity of application;
placement on ballot; procedure for multi-county districts.

(b) Subject to the limitations of W.S. 22-13-119,
each county clerk in each election involving a school or
community college district which crosses county boundaries
shall determine whether voting machines, electronic voting
system, paper ballots, or a combination thereof, shall be
used to insure ensure that each qualified elector votes
only for the candidate or candidates from the school
district and trustee residence area, if any, and from the
community college district and subdistrict, if any, for
which he is entitled to vote.
HB0048

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0040

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0048